Florida, session 2026, SB404.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 23 24 Section 1.âPart XII of chapter 400, Florida Statutes, 25 consisting of ss. 400.9991 through 400.9998, Florida Statutes, 26 is created and entitled âPostsurgical Recovery Home Safety Act.â 27 Section 2.âSection 400.9991, Florida Statutes, is created 28 to read: 29 400.9991âShort title.âSections 400.9991-400.9998 may be 30 cited as the âPostsurgical Recovery Home Safety Act.â 31 Section 3.âSection 400.9992, Florida Statutes, is created 32 to read: 33 400.9992âLegislative findings and intent.âThe Legislature 34 finds that unregulated facilities providing care to patients 35 recovering from surgical or medical procedures present risks to 36 patient safety, health, and well-being. It is the intent of the 37 Legislature to establish clear standards, licensing 38 requirements, and oversight for such facilities to ensure the 39 safe recovery of patients and to prevent confusion with 40 addiction recovery residences. 41 Section 4.âSection 400.9993, Florida Statutes, is created 42 to read: 43 400.9993âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 44 (1)ââAgencyâ means the Agency for Health Care 45 Administration. 46 (2)ââPatientâ means an individual admitted to a 47 postsurgical recovery home following a medical or surgical 48 procedure. 49 (3)ââPostsurgical recovery homeâ means a licensed 50 residential facility providing short-term, nonacute care and 51 support to patients recovering from surgical or medical 52 procedures which is staffed with licensed health care 53 professionals. 54 (4)ââRecovery planâ means a written care plan developed in 55 coordination with the patientâs surgeon or medical provider 56 outlining necessary postoperative care. 57 Section 5.âSection 400.9994, Florida Statutes, is created 58 to read: 59 400.9994âLicensure.â 60 (1)âA person or an entity must be licensed by the agency to 61 operate a postsurgical recovery home. 62 (2)âAn applicant for licensure must submit all of the 63 following: 64 (a)âProof of compliance with all facility safety standards. 65 (b)âCriminal background checks for all owners and staff. 66 (c)âProof of general liability and medical malpractice 67 insurance. 68 (3)âThe agency shall inspect each postsurgical recovery 69 home before issuing a license and annually thereafter. 70 Section 6.âSection 400.9995, Florida Statutes, is created 71 to read: 72 400.9995âMinimum standards for postsurgical recovery 73 homes.â 74 (1)(a)âAt least one licensed practical nurse or registered 75 nurse must be on site or on call 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. 76 (b)âAll staff must be trained in cardiopulmonary 77 resuscitation, basic wound care, and postoperative care 78 procedures. 79 (2)âThe ratio of staff to patients must be maintained as 80 follows: 81 (a)âDaytime: 1 to 8. 82 (b)âNighttime: 1 to 6. 83 (3)âFacility safety standards must include all of the 84 following: 85 (a)âPatient rooms and bathrooms that comply with the 86 Americans with Disabilities Act. 87 (b)âEmergency power supply for critical equipment. 88 (c)âProper disposal of medical waste. 89 (4)âEach facility must maintain: 90 (a)âWritten hurricane evacuation and disaster response 91 plans. 92 (b)âContracts with nearby hospitals for emergency 93 transfers. 94 (5)âEach facility shall provide a patient, the patientâs 95 family, or any other person acting on behalf of the patient 96 with: 97 (a)âA written service agreement before admission. 98 (b)âAccess to a copy of the recovery plan. 99 (c)âThe visitor access policy to prevent isolation. 100 Section 7.âSection 400.9996, Florida Statutes, is created 101 to read: 102 400.9996âProhibited acts.âIt is unlawful to: 103 (1)âOperate a postsurgical recovery home without a license. 104 (2)âAdvertise a facility without a license as a 105 postsurgical recovery home. 106 (3)âProvide patient care in a postsurgical recovery home 107 without adequately trained on-duty staff. 108 Section 8.âSection 400.9997, Florida Statutes, is created 109 to read: 110 400.9997âPenalties.â 111 (1)âAny person or entity that violates this part is subject 112 to: 113 (a)âA civil fine of up to $10,000 per violation. 114 (b)âImmediate suspension or revocation of license. 115 (2)âAny person or entity that operates a postsurgical 116 recovery home without a license commits a felony of the third 117 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 118 775.084. 119 Section 9.âSection 400.9998, Florida Statutes, is created 120 to read: 121 400.9998âRulemaking.âThe agency shall adopt necessary rules 122 to implement this part, including, but not limited to, licensing 123 application and renewal procedures, inspection protocols, and 124 training standards for staff. 125 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.